Idaho, session 2025, H0229.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-132A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-132A. WIRELESS ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICES POLICY RE-
QUIRED. For purposes of this section, "wireless electronic communication
device" means any electronic device, including but not limited to a tele-
phone, personal digital assistant, paging device, text-messaging device,
or other device with similar functions that can be used to wirelessly commu-
nicate with another person. No later than August 1, 2025, each local school
district shall adopt a policy that addresses student possession of wireless
electronic communication devices as defined in this section. Such policy
shall be approved by the school district's board of trustees and shall be
included in the school district's written student conduct standards. If the
policy provided for in this section includes confiscation of wireless elec-
tronic communication devices, it shall also provide for the return of such
devices to the students. At a minimum, such policy shall prohibit the use of
wireless electronic communication devices in classrooms during periods of
academic instruction.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.